notebooks/resources/HFST/English.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        +N      ! Noun tag
        +Sg     ! Singular
        +Pl     ! Plural
        +Poss   ! Possessive form

LEXICON Root
        Nouns ; ! No input, no output

!
! NOUNS start here
!

LEXICON Nouns

cat     N ;
dog     N ;

church    N_s ;
kiss      N_s ;

beauty:beaut    N_y ;
sky:sk          N_y ;


! The noun lexica N and Num are used for stems without any alternation

LEXICON N
+N:0    Num ;

LEXICON Num
+Sg:0   PossWithS ;
+Pl:s   PossWithoutS ;

! The noun lexica N_s and Num_s are used for stems that end in a sibilant
! and need an extra inserted "e"

LEXICON N_s
+N:0    Num_s ;

LEXICON Num_s
+Sg:0   PossWithS ;
+Pl:es  PossWithoutS ;

! The noun lexica N_y and Num_y are used for stems with "y" -> "ie" alternation

LEXICON N_y
+N:0    Num_y ;

LEXICON Num_y
+Sg:y   PossWithS ;
+Pl:ies PossWithoutS ;

! Possessive markers: usually the singular is 's and the plural is '

LEXICON PossWithS
+Poss:'s     # ;
             # ; ! No ending: no input, no output

LEXICON PossWithoutS
+Poss:'      # ;
             # ; ! No ending: no input, no output
